Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Penalties

242.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, for which no other penalty is herein provided, shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; for the second offense, he shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor; for the third and each subsequent offense, he shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any officer who violates subsection (2) of KRS

242.370

shall be guilty of a violation.

History.

2554c-28, 2554c-32, 2554c-34: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 222, effective January 2, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 30, effective July 14, 1992.